Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.22.230

Authority to charge a customer for furnishing items or copies of items.

A financial institution may charge a customer for furnishing items or copies of items as defined in RCW 62A.4-104, in excess of the number of free items or copies of items provided for in RCW 62A.4-406(b), fifty cents per copy furnished plus fees for retrieval at a rate not to exceed the rate assessed when complying with summons issued by the Internal Revenue Service.

[ 1993 c 229 s 118. Formerly RCW 30.22.230.]

NOTES:

Recovery of attorneys' fees—Effective date—1993 c 229: See RCW 62A.11-111 and 62A.11-112.